Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 14. Appointment of FDIC as Receiver.

§ 6.2-925.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Bank”
means any bank or trust company organized under the laws of the Commonwealth.

“FDIC”
or

“Corporation”

means the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. The term includes any successor to the Corporation or any other agency or instrumentality of the United States that undertakes to discharge the purposes of the Corporation.

“Receivership court”
means the circuit court that appoints a receiver for a bank pursuant to this article.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.1; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-926.
Appointment of FDIC as receiver.

In any case where the Commission has closed and taken possession of a bank, the deposits in which are insured by the FDIC, the Commission may apply to the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond for the appointment of the FDIC as receiver. The court, if it finds that the FDIC is willing to accept the appointment, shall appoint the FDIC as receiver. Upon acceptance of the court’s appointment of the FDIC as receiver, the FDIC shall not be required to post bond.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.2; 2010, c. 794; 2018, c. 257.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 257 substituted “the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond” for “any court in the Commonwealth having jurisdiction to appoint receivers” in the first sentence and “the FDIC is willing to accept the appointment, shall appoint the FDIC as receiver” for “to do so will be in the public interest, may appoint the FDIC receiver” in the second sentence.

§ 6.2-927.
Transfer of title to bank assets.

Upon the appointment of the FDIC as receiver, title to all assets of the bank shall vest in the FDIC without the execution of any instruments of conveyance, assignment, transfer, or endorsement.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.3; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-928.
Posting of notice; effect of posting notice.

Immediately upon closing any bank with the intention of proceeding under the provisions of this article, the Commissioner shall post an appropriate notice of closing at the main entrance of the bank. Upon the posting of said notice, (i) no judgment lien, attachment lien, or voluntary lien shall thereafter attach to any asset of the bank and (ii) no director, officer, or agent of the bank thereafter shall have authority to act on behalf of the bank or to convey, transfer, assign, pledge, mortgage, or encumber any asset thereof.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.4; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-929.
Powers of receiver.

The FDIC as receiver shall have the following powers:

To take possession of all books, records, and assets of the bank;

To collect all debts, claims, and judgments belonging to the bank, and to do such other acts as are necessary to preserve or liquidate its assets;

To execute in the name of the bank any instrument necessary or proper to effectuate its powers as receiver or perform its duties as such;

To initiate, pursue, and defend litigation involving any right, claim, interest, or liability of the bank;

To exercise any and all fiduciary functions of the bank as of the date of its appointment as receiver;

To borrow money as necessary in the liquidation of the bank, and to secure such borrowings by the pledge or mortgage of bank assets. The repayment of money borrowed under this subdivision and interest thereon shall be considered an expense of administration for purposes of §

6.2-933

;

To abandon or convey title to any holder of a mortgage, security deed, security interest, or lien against property in which the bank has an interest, whenever the FDIC as receiver determines that to continue to claim such interest is burdensome and of no advantage to the bank, its depositors, creditors, or shareholders;

Subject to the approval of the receivership court, to (i) sell, lease, or exchange any and all real and personal property, (ii) compromise any debt, claim, or judgment due the bank, and (iii) discontinue any action or other proceeding pending therefor; and

Subject to the approval of the receivership court, to (i) pay off all mortgages, security deeds, security agreements, and liens upon any real or personal property belonging to the bank and (ii) purchase at judicial sale or sale authorized by court order any real or personal property in order to protect the bank’s equity therein.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.5; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-930.
Emergency sale of assets.

The FDIC as receiver, with ex parte approval of the receivership court, may sell all or any part of the closed bank’s assets. All or any part of such assets may be sold to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in its capacity as a corporation. The FDIC as receiver may also borrow from the FDIC, in its corporate capacity, any amount necessary to facilitate the assumption of deposit liabilities by an existing bank or a newly chartered bank, and may assign any part or all of the assets of the closed bank as security for such loan.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.6; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-931.
Notice and proof of claim; notice of rejection of claim; petition for hearing.

All parties having claims against the closed bank shall present their claims, substantiated by legal proof, to the FDIC as receiver within 180 days after the closing of the bank. The FDIC as receiver shall cause notice of the claims procedure prescribed by this section to be published once a week for 12 consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in one or more localities as the receivership court may direct, and shall mail such notice to the last address of record of each person whose name appears as a creditor upon books of the bank. The receiver shall notify in writing any claimant whose claim has been rejected within 180 days following receipt of the claim. Any claimant whose claim has been rejected by the receiver may petition the receivership court for a hearing on his claim within 60 days of the date of notice his claim is rejected. Notice shall be deemed given when mailed.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.7; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-932.
Payment of claims filed after prescribed period.

Any claim filed after the 180-day claim period prescribed by §

6.2-931

, and subsequently accepted by the FDIC as receiver or allowed by the receivership court, shall be entitled to share in the distribution of assets only to the extent of the undistributed assets in the hands of the FDIC as receiver on the date such claim is accepted or allowed.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.8; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-933.
Distribution of assets.

All claims against the bank’s estate, proved to the satisfaction of the FDIC as receiver or approved by the receivership court, shall be paid in the following order:

Administration expenses of the liquidation;

Claims given priority under other provisions of state or federal law;

Deposit obligations;

Other general liabilities;

Debt subordinated to the claims of depositors and general creditors; and

Equity capital securities.

No interest on any claim shall be paid until all claims within the same class have received the full principal amount of claim.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.9; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-934.
Receivership procedures involving assets held by closed bank as fiduciary.

The FDIC as receiver, with the approval of the receivership court, has the authority to appoint a successor to all rights, obligations, assets, deposits, agreements, and trusts held by the closed bank as trustee, administrator, executor, guardian, agent, or in any other fiduciary or representative capacity. The successor’s duties and obligations commence upon appointment and are to the same extent binding upon the former bank as though the successor had originally assumed such duties and obligations. Specifically, the successor shall succeed to and be entitled to administer all trusteeships, administrations, executorships, guardianships, agencies, and all other fiduciary or representative proceedings to which the closed bank is named or appointed in wills, whenever probated, or to which it is appointed by any other instrument, court order, or by operation of law. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair any right of the grantor or beneficiary of trust assets to secure the appointment of a substitute trustee or manager. Within 30 days after appointment, the successor shall (i) give written notice, insofar as practicable, to all interested parties named in the books and records of the bank or in trust documents held by it that such successor has been appointed in accordance with state law and (ii) cause the fact of its appointment to be recorded in appropriate courts of record.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.10; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-935.
Termination of executory contracts and leases; liability; extension of statute of limitations.

Within 180 days of the date of the closing of the bank, the FDIC as receiver at its election may reject (i) any executory contract to which the closed bank is party without further liability to the closed bank or the receiver or (ii) any obligation of the bank as a lessee of real or personal property. The receiver’s election to reject a lease creates no claim (a) for rent other than rent accrued to the date of termination or (b) for actual damages, if any, for such termination, not to exceed the equivalent of six months’ payment. Notwithstanding any other law of the Commonwealth, the statute of limitations shall be extended for a period of six months on all causes of action which may accrue to the FDIC as receiver.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.11; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-936.
Subrogation to rights of bank depositors.

Whenever the FDIC pays, or makes available for payment, the insured deposit liabilities of a closed bank, the FDIC, whether or not it acts as receiver, shall be subrogated to all rights of depositors against the closed bank to the same extent as subrogation is provided for by the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1811 et seq.) in the case of a national bank.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.12; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-937.
Destruction of records.

Subject to the approval of the receivership court, the closed bank’s records may be destroyed after the FDIC, as receiver, determines that there is no further need for them.

History.

1983, c. 507, § 6.1-110.13; 2010, c. 794.